Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
PART 9
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

14-5-901. Uniformity of application and construction.

In applying and construing this article, consideration shall be given to the need to promote uniformity of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1602, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2003:

Entire section amended, p. 1263, § 46, effective July 1, 2004.

14-5-902. Transitional provision.

This article, as amended by House Bill 15-1198, enacted in 2015, applies to proceedings begun on or after July 1, 2015, to establish a support order or determine parentage of a child or to register, recognize, enforce, or modify a prior support order, determination, or agreement, whenever issued or entered.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1602, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2003:

(b) added by revision, pp. 1263, 1275, §§ 47, 72.

L. 2015:

Entire section RC&RE, (HB 15-1198), ch. 173, p. 568, § 33, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

Prior to the recreation and reenactment of this section in 2015, subsection (b) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2004. (See L. 2003, pp. 1263, 1275.)

14-5-903. Severability clause.

If any provision of this article or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are severable.

Source:

L. 93:

Entire article R&RE, p. 1602, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.